North Carolina statutes. Chapter 29. Intestate Succession.
Article 7. Advancements.

§ 29-23.
In general.

If a person dies intestate as to all the person’s estate, property which the person gave in his lifetime as an advancement shall be counted toward the advancee’s intestate share, and to the extent that it does not exceed such intestate share, shall be taken into account in computing the estate to be distributed.

History.

1959, c. 879, s. 1; 2011-344, s. 5.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-344, s. 5, effective January 1, 2012, and applicable to estates of decedents dying on or after that date, substituted “the person’s estate” for “his estate” and similar language.

Legal Periodicals.

For survey of 1980 property law, see 59 N.C.L. Rev. 1209 (1981).

§ 29-24.
Presumption of gift.

A gratuitous inter vivos transfer is presumed to be an absolute gift and not an advancement unless shown to be an advancement.

History.

1959, c. 879, s. 1.

§ 29-25.
Effect of advancement.

If the amount of the advancement equals or exceeds the intestate share of the advancee, the advancee shall be excluded from any further portion in the distribution of the estate, but the advancee shall not be required to refund any part of such advancement; and if the amount of the advancement is less than the advancee’s share, the advancee shall be entitled to such additional amount as will give the advancee the advancee’s full share of the intestate donor’s estate.

History.

1959, c. 879, s. 1; 2011-344, s. 5.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-344, s. 5, effective January 1, 2012, and applicable to estates of decedents dying on or after that date, substituted “share of the advancee, the advance shall” for “share of the advance, he shall” or similar language.

§ 29-26.
Valuation.

The value of the property given as an advancement shall be determined as of the time when the advancee came into possession or enjoyment, or at the time of the death of the intestate, whichever first occurs. However, if the value of the property, so advanced, is stated by the intestate donor in a writing signed by the intestate donor and designating the gift as an advancement, such value shall be deemed the value of the advancement.

History.

1959, c. 879, s. 1; 2011-344, s. 5.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-344, s. 5, effective January 1, 2012, and applicable to estates of decedents dying on or after that date, substituted “signed by the intestate donor” for “signed by him.”

§ 29-27.
Death of advancee before intestate donor.

If the advancee dies before the intestate donor leaving a lineal heir or heirs who take by intestate succession from the intestate donor, the advancement shall be taken into account in the same manner as if it had been made directly to such heir or heirs, but the value shall be determined as of the time the original advancee came into possession or enjoyment, or when the heir or heirs came into possession or enjoyment or at the time of the death of the intestate donor, whichever first occurs.

History.

1959, c. 879, s. 1; 1961, c. 958, s. 3.

§ 29-28.
Inventory.

If any person who has, in the lifetime of an intestate donor, received a part of the donor’s property, refuses, upon order of the clerk of superior court of the county in which the administrator or collector qualifies, to give an inventory on oath, setting forth therein to the best of the person’s knowledge and belief the particulars of the transfer of such property, the person shall be considered to have received the person’s full share of the donor’s estate, and shall not be entitled to receive any further part or share.

History.

1959, c. 879, s. 1; 2011-344, s. 5.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-344, s. 5, effective January 1, 2012, and applicable to estates of decedents dying on or after that date, throughout the section, substituted “the person’s” for “his,” or similar language.

§ 29-29.
Release by advancee.

If the advancee acknowledges to the intestate donor by a signed writing that the advancee has been advanced the advancee’s full share of the intestate donor’s estate, both the advancee and those claiming through the advancee shall be excluded from any further participation in the intestate donor’s estate.

History.

1959, c. 879, s. 1; 2011-344, s. 5.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-344, s. 5, effective January 1, 2012, and applicable to estates of decedents dying on or after that date, throughout the section, substituted “the advance” for “his,” or similar language.